Luganda.aff
FLAG long
# Cross product of YT (Using the adverb yet) and Ob (Object markers) to FA
PFX FA Y 662
PFX FA 0 sinnaba .
PFX FA 0 sinnagu .
PFX FA 0 sinnagi .
PFX FA 0 sinnazi .
PFX FA 0 sinnaki .
PFX FA 0 sinnabi .
PFX FA 0 sinnali .
PFX FA 0 sinnaga .
PFX FA 0 sinnaka .
PFX FA 0 sinnabu .
PFX FA 0 sinnalu .
PFX FA 0 sinnaku .
PFX FA 0 sinnatu .
PFX FA 0 sinnamu .
PFX FA 0 tonnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tonnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tonnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tonnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tonnamu .
PFX FA 0 tonnaba .
PFX FA 0 tonnagu .
PFX FA 0 tonnagi .
PFX FA 0 tonnazi .
PFX FA 0 tonnaki .
PFX FA 0 tonnabi .
PFX FA 0 tonnali .
PFX FA 0 tonnaga .
PFX FA 0 tonnaka .
PFX FA 0 tonnabu .
PFX FA 0 tonnalu .
PFX FA 0 tonnaku .
PFX FA 0 tonnatu .
PFX FA 0 tannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tannamu .
PFX FA 0 tannaba .
PFX FA 0 tannagu .
PFX FA 0 tannagi .
PFX FA 0 tannazi .
PFX FA 0 tannaki .
PFX FA 0 tannabi .
PFX FA 0 tannali .
PFX FA 0 tannaga .
PFX FA 0 tannaka .
PFX FA 0 tannabu .
PFX FA 0 tannalu .
PFX FA 0 tannaku .
PFX FA 0 tannatu .
PFX FA 0 tetunnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tetunnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tetunnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tetunnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tetunnamu .
PFX FA 0 tetunnaba .
PFX FA 0 tetunnagu .
PFX FA 0 tetunnagi .
PFX FA 0 tetunnazi .
PFX FA 0 tetunnaki .
PFX FA 0 tetunnabi .
PFX FA 0 tetunnali .
PFX FA 0 tetunnaga .
PFX FA 0 tetunnaka .
PFX FA 0 tetunnabu .
PFX FA 0 tetunnalu .
PFX FA 0 tetunnaku .
PFX FA 0 tetunnatu .
PFX FA 0 temunnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l temunnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l temunnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w temunnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 temunnamu .
PFX FA 0 temunnaba .
PFX FA 0 temunnagu .
PFX FA 0 temunnagi .
PFX FA 0 temunnazi .
PFX FA 0 temunnaki .
PFX FA 0 temunnabi .
PFX FA 0 temunnali .
PFX FA 0 temunnaga .
PFX FA 0 temunnaka .
PFX FA 0 temunnabu .
PFX FA 0 temunnalu .
PFX FA 0 temunnaku .
PFX FA 0 temunnatu .
PFX FA 0 tebannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tebannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tebannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tebannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tebannamu .
PFX FA 0 tebannaba .
PFX FA 0 tebannagu .
PFX FA 0 tebannagi .
PFX FA 0 tebannazi .
PFX FA 0 tebannaki .
PFX FA 0 tebannabi .
PFX FA 0 tebannali .
PFX FA 0 tebannaga .
PFX FA 0 tebannaka .
PFX FA 0 tebannabu .
PFX FA 0 tebannalu .
PFX FA 0 tebannaku .
PFX FA 0 tebannatu .
PFX FA 0 abatannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l abatannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l abatannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w abatannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 abatannamu .
PFX FA 0 abatannaba .
PFX FA 0 abatannagu .
PFX FA 0 abatannagi .
PFX FA 0 abatannazi .
PFX FA 0 abatannaki .
PFX FA 0 abatannabi .
PFX FA 0 abatannali .
PFX FA 0 abatannaga .
PFX FA 0 abatannaka .
PFX FA 0 abatannabu .
PFX FA 0 abatannalu .
PFX FA 0 abatannaku .
PFX FA 0 abatannatu .
PFX FA 0 atannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l atannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l atannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w atannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 atannamu .
PFX FA 0 atannaba .
PFX FA 0 atannagu .
PFX FA 0 atannagi .
PFX FA 0 atannazi .
PFX FA 0 atannaki .
PFX FA 0 atannabi .
PFX FA 0 atannali .
PFX FA 0 atannaga .
PFX FA 0 atannaka .
PFX FA 0 atannabu .
PFX FA 0 atannalu .
PFX FA 0 atannaku .
PFX FA 0 atannatu .
PFX FA 0 tegunnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tegunnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tegunnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tegunnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tegunnamu .
PFX FA 0 tegunnaba .
PFX FA 0 tegunnagu .
PFX FA 0 tegunnagi .
PFX FA 0 tegunnazi .
PFX FA 0 tegunnaki .
PFX FA 0 tegunnabi .
PFX FA 0 tegunnali .
PFX FA 0 tegunnaga .
PFX FA 0 tegunnaka .
PFX FA 0 tegunnabu .
PFX FA 0 tegunnalu .
PFX FA 0 tegunnaku .
PFX FA 0 tegunnatu .
PFX FA 0 ogutannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l ogutannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l ogutannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w ogutannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 ogutannamu .
PFX FA 0 ogutannaba .
PFX FA 0 ogutannagu .
PFX FA 0 ogutannagi .
PFX FA 0 ogutannazi .
PFX FA 0 ogutannaki .
PFX FA 0 ogutannabi .
PFX FA 0 ogutannali .
PFX FA 0 ogutannaga .
PFX FA 0 ogutannaka .
PFX FA 0 ogutannabu .
PFX FA 0 ogutannalu .
PFX FA 0 ogutannaku .
PFX FA 0 ogutannatu .
PFX FA 0 teginnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l teginnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l teginnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w teginnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 teginnamu .
PFX FA 0 teginnaba .
PFX FA 0 teginnagu .
PFX FA 0 teginnagi .
PFX FA 0 teginnazi .
PFX FA 0 teginnaki .
PFX FA 0 teginnabi .
PFX FA 0 teginnali .
PFX FA 0 teginnaga .
PFX FA 0 teginnaka .
PFX FA 0 teginnabu .
PFX FA 0 teginnalu .
PFX FA 0 teginnaku .
PFX FA 0 teginnatu .
PFX FA 0 egitannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l egitannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l egitannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w egitannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 egitannamu .
PFX FA 0 egitannaba .
PFX FA 0 egitannagu .
PFX FA 0 egitannagi .
PFX FA 0 egitannazi .
PFX FA 0 egitannaki .
PFX FA 0 egitannabi .
PFX FA 0 egitannali .
PFX FA 0 egitannaga .
PFX FA 0 egitannaka .
PFX FA 0 egitannabu .
PFX FA 0 egitannalu .
PFX FA 0 egitannaku .
PFX FA 0 egitannatu .
PFX FA 0 tennan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tennand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tennann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tennamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tennamu .
PFX FA 0 tennaba .
PFX FA 0 tennagu .
PFX FA 0 tennagi .
PFX FA 0 tennazi .
PFX FA 0 tennaki .
PFX FA 0 tennabi .
PFX FA 0 tennali .
PFX FA 0 tennaga .
PFX FA 0 tennaka .
PFX FA 0 tennabu .
PFX FA 0 tennalu .
PFX FA 0 tennaku .
PFX FA 0 tennatu .
PFX FA 0 tezinnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tezinnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tezinnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tezinnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tezinnamu .
PFX FA 0 tezinnaba .
PFX FA 0 tezinnagu .
PFX FA 0 tezinnagi .
PFX FA 0 tezinnazi .
PFX FA 0 tezinnaki .
PFX FA 0 tezinnabi .
PFX FA 0 tezinnali .
PFX FA 0 tezinnaga .
PFX FA 0 tezinnaka .
PFX FA 0 tezinnabu .
PFX FA 0 tezinnalu .
PFX FA 0 tezinnaku .
PFX FA 0 tezinnatu .
PFX FA 0 ezitannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l ezitannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l ezitannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w ezitannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 ezitannamu .
PFX FA 0 ezitannaba .
PFX FA 0 ezitannagu .
PFX FA 0 ezitannagi .
PFX FA 0 ezitannazi .
PFX FA 0 ezitannaki .
PFX FA 0 ezitannabi .
PFX FA 0 ezitannali .
PFX FA 0 ezitannaga .
PFX FA 0 ezitannaka .
PFX FA 0 ezitannabu .
PFX FA 0 ezitannalu .
PFX FA 0 ezitannaku .
PFX FA 0 ezitannatu .
PFX FA 0 tekinnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tekinnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tekinnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tekinnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tekinnamu .
PFX FA 0 tekinnaba .
PFX FA 0 tekinnagu .
PFX FA 0 tekinnagi .
PFX FA 0 tekinnazi .
PFX FA 0 tekinnaki .
PFX FA 0 tekinnabi .
PFX FA 0 tekinnali .
PFX FA 0 tekinnaga .
PFX FA 0 tekinnaka .
PFX FA 0 tekinnabu .
PFX FA 0 tekinnalu .
PFX FA 0 tekinnaku .
PFX FA 0 tekinnatu .
PFX FA 0 ekitannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l ekitannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l ekitannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w ekitannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 ekitannamu .
PFX FA 0 ekitannaba .
PFX FA 0 ekitannagu .
PFX FA 0 ekitannagi .
PFX FA 0 ekitannazi .
PFX FA 0 ekitannaki .
PFX FA 0 ekitannabi .
PFX FA 0 ekitannali .
PFX FA 0 ekitannaga .
PFX FA 0 ekitannaka .
PFX FA 0 ekitannabu .
PFX FA 0 ekitannalu .
PFX FA 0 ekitannaku .
PFX FA 0 ekitannatu .
PFX FA 0 tebinnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l tebinnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l tebinnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w tebinnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 tebinnamu .
PFX FA 0 tebinnaba .
PFX FA 0 tebinnagu .
PFX FA 0 tebinnagi .
PFX FA 0 tebinnazi .
PFX FA 0 tebinnaki .
PFX FA 0 tebinnabi .
PFX FA 0 tebinnali .
PFX FA 0 tebinnaga .
PFX FA 0 tebinnaka .
PFX FA 0 tebinnabu .
PFX FA 0 tebinnalu .
PFX FA 0 tebinnaku .
PFX FA 0 tebinnatu .
PFX FA 0 ebitannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l ebitannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l ebitannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w ebitannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 ebitannamu .
PFX FA 0 ebitannaba .
PFX FA 0 ebitannagu .
PFX FA 0 ebitannagi .
PFX FA 0 ebitannazi .
PFX FA 0 ebitannaki .
PFX FA 0 ebitannabi .
PFX FA 0 ebitannali .
PFX FA 0 ebitannaga .
PFX FA 0 ebitannaka .
PFX FA 0 ebitannabu .
PFX FA 0 ebitannalu .
PFX FA 0 ebitannaku .
PFX FA 0 ebitannatu .
PFX FA 0 telinnan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l telinnand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l telinnann l.[mn]
PFX FA w telinnamp [w]
PFX FA 0 telinnamu .
PFX FA 0 telinnaba .
PFX FA 0 telinnagu .
PFX FA 0 telinnagi .
PFX FA 0 telinnazi .
PFX FA 0 telinnaki .
PFX FA 0 telinnabi .
PFX FA 0 telinnali .
PFX FA 0 telinnaga .
PFX FA 0 telinnaka .
PFX FA 0 telinnabu .
PFX FA 0 telinnalu .
PFX FA 0 telinnaku .
PFX FA 0 telinnatu .
PFX FA 0 elitannan [^lmnb]
PFX FA l elitannand l.[^mn]
PFX FA l elitannann l.[mn]
PFX FA w elitannamp [w]
PFX FA 0 elitannamu .
